Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.555, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Notice of closing, curtailing operations, relocating services, or ceasing to offer certain services; hospitals. (a) The controlling persons of a hospital licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56 or a hospital campus must notify the commissioner of health, the public, and others at least 182 days before the hospital or hospital campus voluntarily plans to implement one of the scheduled actions listed in paragraph (b), unless the controlling persons can demonstrate to the commissioner that meeting the advanced notice requirement is not feasible and the commissioner approves a shorter advanced notice. (b) The following scheduled actions require advanced notice under paragraph (a): (1) ceasing operations; (2) curtailing operations to the extent that deleted text begin patientsdeleted text end new text begin inpatients or emergency department servicesnew text end must be relocated; (3) relocating the provision ofnew text begin inpatientnew text end health servicesnew text begin or emergency department servicesnew text end to another hospital or deleted text begin anotherdeleted text end hospital campus; or (4) ceasing to offernew text begin inpatientnew text end maternity care andnew text begin inpatientnew text end newborn care services,new text begin inpatientnew text end intensive care unit services, inpatient mental health services, or inpatient substance use disorder treatment services. (c) A notice required under this subdivision must comply with the requirements in subdivision 1d. (d) The commissioner shall cooperate with the controlling persons and advise them about relocating the patients. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.555, subdivision 1b, is amended to read: Subd. 1b. Public hearing. Within 30 days after receiving notice under subdivision 1a, the commissioner shall conduct a public hearing on the scheduled cessation of operations, curtailment of operations, relocation of health services, or cessation in offering health services. The commissioner must provide adequate public notice of the hearing in a time and manner determined by the commissioner.new text begin The commissioner must ensure that video conferencing technology will be used to allow members of the public to view and participate in the hearing.new text end The controlling persons of the hospital or hospital campus must participate in the public hearing. The public hearing must be held at a location that is within ten miles of the hospital or hospital campus or with the commissioner's approval as close as is practicable, and that is provided or arranged by the hospital or hospital campus. deleted text begin Video conferencing technology must be used to allow members of the public to view and participate in the hearing.deleted text end The public hearing must include: (1) an explanation by the controlling persons of the reasons for ceasing or curtailing operations, relocating health services, or ceasing to offer any of the listed health services; (2) a description of the actions that controlling persons will take to ensure that residents in the hospital's or campus's service area have continued access to the health services being eliminated, curtailed, or relocated; (3) an opportunity for public testimony on the scheduled cessation or curtailment of operations, relocation of health services, or cessation in offering any of the listed health services, and on the hospital's or campus's plan to ensure continued access to those health services being eliminated, curtailed, or relocated; and (4) an opportunity for the controlling persons to respond to questions from interested persons.